Florida, session 2026, HB515.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
108
109 Section 1. Section 383.295, Florida Statutes, is created
110 to read:
111 383.295 Doulas.—
112 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
113 (a) "Department" means the Department of Health.
114 (b) "Doula" means a nonmedical professional who provides
115 health education, advocacy, and physical, emotional, and
116 nonmedical support for pregnant and postpartum women before,
117 during, and after childbirth, including support during
118 miscarriage and stillbirth. Doulas are not clinical providers
119 and are not licensed.
120 (c) "Doula services" means the provision of physical,
121 emotional, and informational support by a nonmedical
122 professional to a pregnant woman during the prenatal,
123 intrapartum, and postpartum periods. Activities may include
124 childbirth education, labor support, postpartum recovery
125 support, assistance with infant care, lactation support, and
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
126 connection to community resources.
127 (d) "Evidence-based" means a process in which decisions
128 are made and actions or activities are carried out, based on the
129 best evidence available, with the goal of removing subjective
130 opinion, unfounded beliefs, or bias from decisions and actions.
131 Such evidence may include practitioner experience and expertise
132 as well as feedback from other practitioners and beneficiaries.
133 (2) PILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED.—
134 (a) The Doula Support for Healthy Births pilot program is
135 established in Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach Counties to
136 integrate doula services into existing maternal health
137 initiatives, targeting pregnant and postpartum women who have
138 overcome or are overcoming substance use disorders.
139 (b) The purpose of the pilot program is to improve birth
140 outcomes by decreasing preterm birth rates and cesarean
141 deliveries, enhancing access to care, and supporting maternal
142 well-being throughout the pregnancy, labor, and postpartum
143 periods using evidence-based methods.
144 (c) The Department of Health, through its maternal and
145 child health section, shall implement and oversee the pilot
146 program.
147 (3) PROGRAM STRUCTURE.—
148 (a) The pilot program may operate for 12 to 24 months,
149 subject to funding.
150 (b) The pilot program shall target the enrollment of
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
151 pregnant and postpartum women who have overcome or are
152 overcoming substance use disorders.
153 (c) The following support services must be offered under
154 the pilot program:
155 1. Prenatal support, such as educational resources,
156 personalized birth plans, and emotional support.
157 2. Labor support, such as continuous emotional support,
158 comfort measures, and communication facilitation.
159 3. Postpartum support, such as assistance with newborn
160 care, postpartum resources, and household tasks.
161 4. Advocacy support, such as assistance with preferences
162 and needs within medical settings and health care navigation.
163 5. Comprehensive emotional support during the pregnancy
164 and postpartum periods.
165 (4) COLLABORATION; INTEGRATION.—
166 (a) The department shall collaborate with:
167 1. Health care providers, community organizations,
168 community coalitions, and advocacy groups to integrate doulas
169 and doula services into existing maternal health programs,
170 ensuring that such doulas are trained and meet all of the
171 following criteria:
172 a. Demonstrate a strong understanding of the reproductive
173 system, labor process, and postpartum recovery.
174 b. Are proficient in hands-on techniques, such as massage,
175 counterpressure, breathing exercises, and nonmedicated pain
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
176 management.
177 c. Support a client's birth plan, communicate effectively
178 with medical staff, and advocate for informed consent.
179 d. Provide guidance on breastfeeding, basic newborn care,
180 and both the physical and emotional aspects of postpartum
181 recovery.
182 e. Use active listening, clear communication, and conflict
183 resolution skills in interactions with clients and health care
184 providers.
185 f. Understand common medical complications and provide
186 emotional and physical support to clients in challenging
187 situations.
188 g. Uphold professionalism, ethical decisionmaking, and
189 legal responsibilities in doula practice.
190 2. Local WIC programs, hospitals, birth centers, and
191 community health centers to facilitate outreach and service
192 delivery.
193 (b) The department may integrate doula services into
194 existing maternal and child health programs as an expansion of
195 the pilot program, focusing on pregnant and postpartum women who
196 have overcome or are overcoming substance use disorders. Any
197 such expansion of the pilot program must include annual
198 reporting requirements for the department to evaluate
199 effectiveness, equity, and quality of integrating doula services
200 into the existing maternal and child health programs.
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
201 (5) FUNDING.—The pilot program shall be funded using
202 appropriations for the Closing the Gap grant program established
203 under ss. 381.7351-381.7356. The department shall coordinate
204 with its Division of Community Health Promotion and Office of
205 Minority Health and Health Equity to seek additional federal
206 funds to support implementation.
207 Section 2. Doula Certification Task Force.—
208 (1) ESTABLISHMENT.—There is created within the Department
209 of Health the Doula Certification Task Force, a task force as
210 defined in s. 20.03(5), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of
211 reviewing the scope of doula services and ensuring competency,
212 quality, and consistency in the delivery of doula services to
213 pregnant and postpartum women.
214 (2) OVERSIGHT.—The Department of Health shall oversee and
215 provide administrative support to the task force.
216 (3) MEMBERSHIP; MEETINGS.—
217 (a) The task force shall be composed of nine members.
218 Three members shall be appointed by the Governor, three members
219 shall be appointed by the Senate President, and three members
220 shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
221 Representatives. Of the nine members, two members must be health
222 care practitioners as defined in s. 456.001, Florida Statutes,
223 experienced in caring for pregnant or postpartum women, and at
224 least one member must be a doula or otherwise have experience
225 providing nonmedical support services to pregnant or postpartum
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
226 women. A vacancy on the task force must be filled in the same
227 manner as the original appointment. The task force shall elect a
228 chair from among its members.
229 (b) The task force shall meet as often as necessary to
230 complete its work, but at least quarterly, at the call of the
231 chair. The task force may conduct its meetings through
232 teleconference or other similar electronic means.
233 (4) DUTIES.—The task force shall do all of the following:
234 (a) Review the scope of practice for doulas in this state,
235 as well as in other states.
236 (b) Establish core competencies for the provision of doula
237 services.
238 (c) Recommend minimum certification standards for doulas,
239 which must include, but need not be limited to, all of the
240 following:
241 1. Possession of a high school diploma or its equivalent.
242 2. Completion of a department-approved, evidence-based
243 training program.
244 3. A minimum number of supervised practice hours.
245 4. Completion of a background screening.
246 5. Education in professional ethics.
247 (5) REPORT.—By January 1, 2028, the task force shall
248 submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the
249 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
250 House of Representatives.
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 515 2026
251 (6) SUNSET.—The task force shall operate on a temporary
252 basis in conjunction with the Doula Support for Healthy Births
253 pilot program established under s. 383.295, Florida Statutes, as
254 created by this act, and shall expire on October 2, 2029, in
255 accordance with s. 20.052(8), Florida Statutes.
256 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
257
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb515-00